District of Columbia statutes.
38-1207.06

Additional educational opportunities.

This subchapter shall not be construed to prohibit the University from offering eligible parents, caretaker relatives, or legal guardians eligible pursuant to this subchapter additional financial assistance, additional educational opportunities free of charge or at reduced charge, or other assistance supplemental to or in addition to the minimum requirements specified by this subchapter.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VII, § 706
as added Feb. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-74, § 2, 34 DCR 7946
1981 Ed., § 31-1576.